Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 3.1
PROTECTIVE SERVICES FOR ADULTS
AT RISK OF MISTREATMENT OR SELF-NEGLECT

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1983. This article was repealed and reenacted in 1991, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1991, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following the relocated sections.

Section

PART 1 PROTECTIVE SERVICES
FOR AT-RISK ADULTS

PART 2 FINANCIAL EXPLOITATION
OF AT-RISK ADULTS

PART 3 ELDER ABUSE TASK FORCE